District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

38-2306

Purposes.

Repealed.

History

June 18, 1954, 68 Stat. 265, ch. 324, § 2
Aug. 4, 1986, 100 Stat. 1790, Pub. L. 99-371, § 410

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-1806.
1973 Ed., § 31-1026.